Wisconsin, session 2025, AB225.
do enact as follows:AB225,1Section 1. 801.50 (3c) of the statutes is created to read:801.50 (3c) In determining whether a county is a proper venue under sub. (2) (c), the court may not consider the participation of any of the following:(a) A party joined to the civil action or special proceeding pursuant to s. 803.03.(b) An insurer joined to the civil action or special proceeding pursuant to s. 803.04.AB225,2Section 2. 801.50 (3g) of the statutes is created to read:801.50 (3g) For the purposes of sub. (2) (c), a corporation, limited liability company, or other business entity shall be deemed to reside in the place of incorporation or organization, and a corporation, limited liability company, or other business entity shall be deemed to be doing substantial business only in the county of its principal place of business. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab225 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab225 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB225 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB225 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»AB225: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting